Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.290

Violators may be excluded.

A board of library trustees may exclude from the use of the library under its charge any person who wilfully and persistently violates any rule or regulation prescribed for the use of the library or its facilities or any person whose physical condition is deemed dangerous or offensive to other library users.

[ 1935 c 119 s 15; RRS s 8226-15. Prior: 1909 c 116 s 9, part; 1901 c 166 s 9, part.]